Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1204
Credit facility; authorized; approval;
terms and conditions.

Any
governmental unit in the State of Nebraska may obtain credit support for its
bonds by entering into or obtaining a credit facility for any of its bonds
from any United States governmental enterprise or from any bank providing
a credit facility which is confirmed or otherwise supported by a credit facility
provided by a United States governmental enterprise. Any credit facility shall
be approved by a measure adopted before or after issuance of any bonds. Each
credit facility shall have such terms and conditions as shall be approved
by a measure adopted by the governmental unit before or after the issuance
of bonds.

Laws 2009, LB377, § 4.